Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,242.02
Commissary, defined.

Commissary shall mean a food establishment where food, food containers, or food supplies are kept, handled, prepared, packaged, or stored for use in mobile food units, pushcarts, or vending machines.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 6.